District of Columbia statutes.
6-601.01

Nonfireproof dwellings.

No combustible or nonfireproof building in the District of Columbia used or occupied or intended to be used or occupied as a dwelling, flat, apartment house, tenement, lodging or boarding house, hospital, dormitory, or for any similar purpose shall be erected, altered, or raised to a height of more than 4 stories, or more than 55 feet in height above the sidewalk, and no combustible or nonfireproof building shall be converted to any of the uses aforesaid if it exceeds either of said limits of height.

History

June 1, 1910, 36 Stat. 452, ch. 263, § 1
May 20, 1912, 37 Stat. 114, ch. 124

Cross References

Building regulations, powers and duties of Council and Mayor, see § 1-303.04.
Civil infractions, administrative review, appeals, see § 2-1803.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-601.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-401.
1973 Ed., § 5-401.